Montana, session 2025, SB528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Limitation on credit card transaction fees. (1) A landlord, property
manager, merchant, vendor, creditor, or other party may charge a consumer a credit card transaction fee that is
not more than 3% of the total amount of the credit card transaction or as otherwise provided by contract.
(2) Prior to charging a credit card transaction fee, the party charging the fee shall clearly disclose
the fee prior to the completion of the credit card transaction.
(3) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON ENGAGED IN DEBT COLLECTION.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 31, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 31, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 528